Missouri, session 2026, HB3384.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 407.652 and 407.653, to read as follows:
407.652. As used in this section and section 407.653, the following terms mean:
(1) "Authorized repair provider", an individual or business that has an oral or
written arrangement for a definite or indefinite period in which a manufacturer or
distributor transfers to a separate business organization or individual licensee the right
to use a trade name, service mark, or other proprietary identifier for the purposes of
offering diagnosis, maintenance, or repair services under the name of the manufacturer.
A manufacturer that offers diagnosis, maintenance, or repair services for its product
and that does not have an arrangement with an individual or business described in this
subdivision shall be considered an authorized repair provider;
(2) "Documentation", manuals, diagrams, reporting output, schematic
diagrams, service code descriptions, or other information provided to the authorized
repair provider for the purposes of diagnosis, maintenance, repair, or refurbishment;
(3) "Embedded software", programmable instructions provided on firmware
delivered with certain products or parts for the purposes of product operation,
including all relevant safety, security, and defect patches and fixes made by the
manufacturer for this purpose. "Embedded software" shall include all software that
meets this definition, regardless of name including, but not limited to, assembly code,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3384 2
basic internal operating system, internal operating system, machine code, microcode, or
root code;
(4) "Fair and reasonable terms", an equitable price in light of relevant factors
including, but not limited to:
(a) The net cost to an authorized repair provider for similar parts,
documentation, or tools obtained from manufacturers less any discounts, rebates, or
other incentive programs;
(b) The cost to the manufacturer for preparing and distributing the parts or
product, excluding any research and development costs incurred in designing and
implementing, upgrading, or altering the product, but including amortized capital costs
for the preparation and distribution of the parts; and
(c) The price charged by other manufacturers for similar parts or products.

For documentation including, but not limited to, software updates, "fair and reasonable
terms" shall mean at no charge, except if documentation is requested in printed form,
the manufacturer may charge for reasonable costs of preparing and sending the
documentation. For software tools, "fair and reasonable terms" shall mean at no
charge and without requiring authorization, without requiring internet access, and
without impeding access or use of the product;
(5) "Farm machinery", any mobile equipment or machinery including, but not
limited to, tractors, trailers, combines, tillage implements, balers, unmanned aircraft
systems, off-road vehicles, and other equipment, including attachments and repair parts
thereof, used in the planting, cultivating, irrigating, harvesting, or ranching of
agricultural products, excluding self-propelled machines designed primarily for the
transportation of persons or property on a street or highway;
(6) "Independent repair provider", an individual or business operating in the
state that is not affiliated with a manufacturer or a manufacturer's authorized dealer of
a product but is engaged in the diagnosis, service, maintenance, or repair of products. A
manufacturer's authorized dealer shall be considered an independent repair provider if
the dealer engages in the diagnosis, service, maintenance, or repair of a product that is
not affiliated with the manufacturer;
(7) "Manufacturer", an individual or business that, in the ordinary course of its
business, is engaged in selling or leasing new products to consumers or other end users
and is engaged in the diagnosis, service, maintenance, or repair of those products;
(8) "Owner", an individual or business that lawfully acquires a product
purchased or used in the state;

HB 3384 3
(9) "Product", any farm machinery regardless of the date purchased, whose
functioning depends, in whole or in part, on embedded or attached digital electronics;
(10) "Remote diagnostics", a remote data transfer function between certain
products and a provider of repair services, including for purposes of remote diagnostics,
settings controls, or location identification;
(11) "Service parts", replacement parts, either new or used, made available by
the manufacturer to an authorized repair provider for the purposes of repair;
(12) "Tools", any software program, hardware implement, or other apparatus
used for diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a product including, but not limited to,
software or other mechanisms that provision, program, or pair a new part, calibrate
functionality, or perform a function required to bring the product back to fully
functional condition;
(13) "Trade secret", anything tangible, intangible, or electronically stored or
kept that constitutes, represents, evidences, or records intellectual property including,
but not limited to:
(a) Secret or confidentially held designs, processes, procedures, formulas,
inventions, or improvements;
(b) Secret or confidentially held scientific, technical, merchandising, production,
financial, business, or management information; or
(c) Any trade secret as that term is defined under paragraph (3) of 18 U.S.C.
Section 1839.
407.653. 1. Owners of products purchased or used in this state and independent
repair providers shall have the right to:
(1) Access the same diagnostic and repair information of products manufactured
by the manufacturer as the manufacturer makes available to authorized repair
providers. Such information shall be provided in the same manner and at the same time
as provided to authorized repair providers. Such information shall include, but not be
limited to, repair technical updates, diagnostic software, service access passwords,
updates and corrections to firmware, and related documentation;
(2) Purchase service parts, documentation, and tools available upon fair and
reasonable terms. Such service parts shall be made available in the same manner and at
the same time as given to authorized repair providers. Such service parts shall include
updates to firmware of parts; and
(3) Upon the purchase or acquisition of a product, receive a disclosure of any
changes or modifications made to the product by previous owners.


HB 3384 4
Nothing in this section shall require the manufacturer to sell service parts if the service
parts are no longer available to the manufacturer or the authorized repair channel of
the manufacturer.
2. An authorized repair provider shall have the right to purchase diagnostic,
service, or repair information of a product in a format standardized with other
manufacturers instead of a proprietary format from a manufacturer if the
manufacturer sells diagnostic, service, or repair information to independent repair
providers or third-party providers in such a standardized format or if the manufacturer
offers terms and conditions more favorable to independent repair providers or third-
party providers than the manner and the terms and conditions that are available to an
authorized repair provider. However, this subsection shall not apply if the proprietary
format includes diagnostic, service, repair, or dealership operations information or
functionality not available in a standardized format.
3. Owners and independent repair providers shall have the right to purchase
from manufacturers of products sold or used in this state all diagnostic repair tools,
incorporating the same diagnostic repair and remote diagnostic capabilities that the
manufacturer makes available to its own repair or engineering staff or any authorized
repair providers, on fair and reasonable terms.
4. For equipment that contains an electronic security lock or other security-
related function, the manufacturer shall make available to owners and independent
repair providers, on fair and reasonable terms, any special documentation, tools, and
parts needed to disable the lock or function and to reset it when disabled in the course of
diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the equipment. The documentation, tools, and
parts may be made available through an appropriate secure system.
5. Manufacturers that provide repair information to aftermarket tools,
diagnostics, or third-party service information publications and systems have fully
satisfied their obligations under this section and thereafter, are not responsible for the
content and functionality of aftermarket diagnostic tools or service information systems.
6. If a manufacturer has made an express warranty with respect to a product
and the wholesale price of the equipment is one hundred dollars or more, the
manufacturer shall provide the parts, tools, and documentation needed to repair the
product during the warranty period at an equitable price, with convenient delivery, and
with an enabled functionality, considering:
(1) The actual cost to the manufacturer to prepare and distribute the part, tool,
or documentation, exclusive of any research and development costs incurred;
(2) The ability of owners or independent repair providers to afford the part, tool,
or documentation; and

HB 3384 5
(3) The means by which the part, tool, or documentation is distributed.
7. Manufacturers of products sold or used in the state for the purposes of
providing security-related functions shall not exclude diagnostic, service, or repair
information necessary to reset a security-related electronic function from information
provided to owners and independent repair providers. If necessary for security
purposes, manufacturers shall provide information necessary to reset and unlock system
or security-related electronic modules to owners and independent repair providers
through an appropriate secure data release system.
8. Nothing in this section shall require the manufacturer to divulge a trade secret
to an owner or to an independent repair provider, except as necessary to provide
documentation, parts, and tools on fair and reasonable terms.
9. Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, this section shall not be read,
interpreted, or construed to abrogate, interfere with, contradict, or alter the terms of an
agreement executed between an authorized repair provider and a manufacturer
including, but not limited to, performing warranty or recall repair work by an
authorized repair provider on behalf of a manufacturer pursuant to the authorized
repair agreement. Except in the case of a dispute arising between a manufacturer and
its authorized repair provider related to either party's compliance with an existing
repair agreement, an authorized repair provider shall have all the rights and remedies
provided in this section.
10. This section shall not require manufacturers or authorized repair providers
to provide an owner or independent repair provider access to nondiagnostic and
nonrepair information provided by a manufacturer to an authorized repair provider
under the agreement between the manufacturer and the authorized repair provider.
11. (1) An independent repair provider or owner who believes that a
manufacturer has failed to provide information including, but not limited to,
documentation, updates to firmware, safety and security corrections, diagnostics,
documentation, or a tool required by this section shall notify the manufacturer in
writing and give the manufacturer thirty days from the date the manufacturer receives
the complaint to cure the failure. If the manufacturer cures the complaint within thirty
days, damages are limited to actual damages in any subsequent litigation.
(2) If the manufacturer fails to respond in a timely manner to the notice
described under subdivision (1) of this subsection or if an independent repair provider
or an owner is not satisfied with the manufacturer's cure, the independent repair
provider or the owner may file a complaint in district court. The complaint shall
include:

HB 3384 6
(a) Written information confirming that the complainant attempted to acquire
and use, through the then-available standard support function provided by the
manufacturer, all relevant diagnostics, tools, service parts, documentation, and updates
to embedded software, including communication with customer assistance via the
manufacturer's then-standard process, if made available by the manufacturer; and
(b) Evidence of manufacturer notification as required in subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
12. No manufacturer shall be required to provide any information or service
parts under subsection 1 of this section if the product for which the information or
service parts are sought is under a valid warranty for repair or replacement of the
product.
100 13. The attorney general shall enforce this section. Each violation of this section
101 shall be punishable by a ten-thousand-dollar fine, which shall be distributed to schools
102 under Article IX, Section 7 of the Constitution of Missouri.
✔